Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXI Agriculture and Animals
CHAPTER 263 Disposal of Dead Animals

263.010.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires otherwise:

“Board” means the Board of Agriculture.

“Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Agriculture.

“Animals” include all members of species equine, ovine, bovine, porcine, feline, canine, lapin and avian.

“Communicable disease” includes hog cholera, brucellosis, leptospirosis, anthrax, black leg, catarrhal influenza in cattle, contagious pleuro-pneumonia, foot and mouth disease or aphthous fever, glanders, hemorrhagic septicemia, maladie du coit or dourine, mange of cattle, necrobacillosis and foot rot in sheep, hydrophobia, rinderpest, scabies in cattle, Texas tick or southern cattle fever, tuberculosis or any other disease proclaimed by the board to be of a transmissible character.

“Loading platform” means any place operated by a license holder for dead animals, poultry and fish or parts thereof which are collected for loading onto trucks which will then take them to rendering plants.

“License holder” means any person who has completed the necessary application to the department and the department has issued a license under the terms of this chapter.

“Department” means the Department of Agriculture.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 1.

263.020.
License for business of collecting animal carcasses required.

Except as provided in KRS

263.160

no person shall engage in the business of disposing of, or picking up, or collecting, or operating a loading platform in connection therewith, of the bodies or parts of bodies of dead or slaughtered animals, poultry, fish, scrap, offal, hides, bones, fat, grease or other raw rendering materials, or by-products thereof, without first obtaining a license for that purpose from the Department of Agriculture, hereafter called the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 2.

Research References and Practice Aids

ALR

Stealing carcass as within statute making it larceny to steal cattle or livestock. 78 A.L.R.2d 1100.

263.030.
Application for license, contents, forms.

Application for a license shall be made to the department on forms provided by it, which application shall set forth the name and address of the applicant, his place or proposed place of business and the particular method which he intends to employ in the disposition of dead bodies of animals or parts thereof or the operation of a loading platform or trucks and such other relevant information as the department requires.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 3.

263.040.
Inspection of applicant’s premises — Certification of findings.

On receipt of an application an inspector of the department shall at once inspect the building and equipment which the applicant proposes to use to conduct such business and if the inspector finds that the building and equipment comply with the requirements of this chapter and with the regulations of the department, he shall certify in writing his specific findings to the department and send a copy to the applicant. If he finds that it does not comply he shall also certify this to the department and to the applicant.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 4.

263.050.
License issued when — Fee.

On receipt of the report of the inspector finding the building and equipment meets the requirements of this chapter and upon the payment of the fee provided herein the department shall issue a license to the applicant to conduct such business at the place or places specified in the application for one (1) calendar year. The fee for any license is one hundred dollars ($100).

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 5.

263.060.
Record of applications.

The department shall keep or cause to be kept a public record of all licenses applied for, issued or rejected.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 6.

263.070.
Annual renewal of licenses.

The original license shall be renewed for each subsequent calendar year on the payment of the same fee specified in KRS

263.050

if the holder of the license continues to comply with this chapter and the regulations of the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 7.

263.080.
Specifications for disposal plants.

Each place of business shall be provided with floors constructed of concrete or some other nonabsorbent material, adequate drainage, buildings adapted to carry on the business, adequate water supply and supplied with sufficient steam and steam hose or other equipment approved by the department to clean floors and trucks. The floors, walls and all buildings and equipment therein shall at all times be kept in a reasonably sanitary condition and shall be cleaned with steam or other methods and procedures approved by the department. Trucks and truck equipment shall at all times be kept in a reasonably sanitary condition and the trucks shall be cleaned with steam or other methods and procedures approved by the department. All plants shall be equipped with sufficient steam and steam hose or other equipment to carry out the requirements of this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 8.

263.090.
Disposal methods, requirements.

The following requirements shall be observed in the disposal of the bodies of dead animals, poultry, fish or parts thereof, or offal and by-products of slaughtered animals:

All bodies or parts thereof and excrements therefrom shall be processed or disposed of within forty-eight (48) hours after being delivered to the plant.

Cooking vats or tanks shall be airtight, except proper escapes for live steam.

Steam shall be so disposed of as not to cause an unnecessary nuisance.

The skinning and dismembering of bodies or parts of bodies shall be done within the building.

No uncooked bodies or parts thereof shall be fed to any livestock. This does not prohibit the sale of such products for pet food, or for dogs, cats and animals in a zoo.

Such parts of bodies as are not entirely consumed by cooking or burning shall be buried or disposed of to an approved license holder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 9.

263.100.
Regulations, adoption.

The department may adopt, issue and enforce such regulations as in its judgment are necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of this chapter. Before the adoption of any regulations the department shall hold a public hearing and shall notify all license holders as to the time, date and place of the public hearing and the purpose and contents of the proposed regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 10.

263.110.
Inspection of plants and vehicles, when required.

The department shall inspect each place or truck licensed under this chapter at least once each year or as often as it determines necessary and furnish a report of this inspection to the department and a copy to the license holder.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 11.

263.120.
Transportation of animals dying of communicable disease.

Except as herein otherwise provided any person holding a license under this chapter may haul and transport the bodies or parts thereof of animals, poultry and fish that have died from a communicable disease in a covered vehicle, bed or tank which is so constructed that no drippings or seepings from such bodies can escape from such vehicle, bed or tank.

The hauling or transporting of the bodies or parts thereof of any animals, poultry or fish that have died of a highly contagious, infectious or communicable disease shall be prohibited except by specific methods approved by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, §§ 12, 13.

263.130.
Vehicles to be disinfected, when, how.

The driver or owner of a vehicle used in conveying animals, poultry or fish or parts thereof, which the driver or owner has reason to believe died of a communicable disease, shall immediately after unloading the animals, poultry or fish or parts thereof cause the vehicle bed, tank, wheels, canvasing and covers to be disinfected with a solution of at least one (1) part of creosol dip to four (4) parts of water or with some other equally effective disinfectant approved by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 14.

263.140.
Sale of unrendered body or part, labeling requirements.

No unrendered bodies or parts thereof of animals, poultry, fish or by-products thereof shall be sold or offered for sale to the public without a labeled wrapper or other identification and denatured in a manner acceptable to the department. Such label or identification shall plainly state in legible letters at least two (2) inches high that the product is inedible and not sold or intended for human consumption.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 15.

263.150.
Loading platform specifications — Sanitation requirements.

Each loading platform shall be provided with floors constructed of concrete or some other nonabsorbent material, adequate drainage, and adequate water supply, steam or other facilities approved by the department to clean floors and trucks. Each loading platform and equipment therein and the trucks and truck equipment shall at all times be kept in a reasonably sanitary condition.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 16.

263.160.
Operations exempt from law.

This chapter does not apply to: (1) the premises of the rendering operations on the premises of an establishment operating under United States government inspection; (2) a slaughter house or meat processing plant holding a permit or license from the State Health Department that conducts rendering operations on raw rendering materials resulting only from slaughter house and meat processing establishments; (3) a farmer who slaughters his own animals, raised by him on his own farm, processes his own meat therefrom, and who disposes of his raw rendering material only by delivery to a person licensed under this chapter; (4) cured hides and skins.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 17.

263.990.
Penalties.

Any person who violates any provision of this chapter shall be fined not less than ten dollars ($10), nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 47, § 18.